North Carolina, session 2025, SB865.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. REINSTATE EDUCATION-BASED SALARY SUPPLEMENTS FOR
TEACHERS AND INSTRUCTIONAL SUPPORT PERSONNEL
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 115C-302.10 is repealed.
SECTION 1.(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the 2026-2027
fiscal year, State Board of Education policy TCP-A-006, as it was in effect on June 30, 2013,
shall be used to determine (i) whether teachers and instructional support personnel are paid on
the "M" salary schedule and (ii) whether they receive a salary supplement for academic
preparation at the six-year or doctoral degree level.
SECTION 1.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of eight million dollars ($8,000,000) in recurring funds beginning in
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to reinstate education-based salary supplements for teachers and
instructional support personnel in accordance with this act.
SECTION 1.(d) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026.

PART II. RESTORE LONGEVITY PAYMENTS FOR EDUCATORS
SECTION 2.(a) Section 9.1(d) of S.L. 2014-100 is repealed.
SECTION 2.(b) For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, annual longevity payments for
teachers and instructional support personnel shall be at the rate of one and one-half percent
(1.5%) of base salary for 10 to 14 years of State service, two and twenty-five hundredths percent
(2.25%) of base salary for 15 to 19 years of State service, three and twenty-five hundredths
percent (3.25%) of base salary for 20 to 24 years of State service, and four and one-half percent
(4.5%) of base salary for 25 or more years of State service. The longevity payment shall be paid
in a lump sum once per year.
SECTION 2.(c) For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, longevity payments for principals
and assistant principals shall be as provided for State employees under the North Carolina Human
Resources Act.
SECTION 2.(d) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year the sum of one hundred forty million
three hundred thousand dollars ($140,300,000) in recurring funds to restore longevity payments
for educators pursuant to this act.
*S865-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2.(e) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026.

PART III. PREVENT THE ELIMINATION OF RETIREE MEDICAL BENEFITS FOR
MEMBERS FIRST EARNING SERVICE ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2021, UNDER
THE NORTH CAROLINA TEACHERS' AND STATE EMPLOYEES' RETIREMENT
SYSTEM, THE CONSOLIDATED JUDICIAL RETIREMENT SYSTEM, THE
LEGISLATIVE RETIREMENT SYSTEM, OR THE OPTIONAL RETIREMENT
PROGRAMS
SECTION 3.1.(a) Subsections (c) and (d) of Section 35.21 of S.L. 2017-57 are
repealed.
SECTION 3.1.(b) This section is effective retroactively to December 31, 2020.
SECTION 3.2.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of State Treasurer the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) in recurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to address the increased cost to the North Carolina State Health
Plan for Teachers and State Employees as a result of the continuation of retiree medical benefits
under this act.
SECTION 3.2.(b) Subsection (a) of this section becomes effective July 1, 2026.

PART IV. EXPAND NC TEACHING FELLOWS PROGRAM
SECTION 4.(a) G.S. 116-209.62 reads as rewritten:
"§ 116-209.62. North Carolina Teaching Fellows Program established; administration.
…
(f) Program Selection Criteria. – The Authority shall administer the Program in
cooperation with up to 10 11 institutions of higher education with approved educator preparation
programs selected by the Commission that represent a diverse selection of both postsecondary
constituent institutions o The University of North Carolina and private postsecondary institutions
operating in the State. At a minimum, the Commission shall select North Carolina Agricultural
and Technical State University, a designated historically black college and university (HBCU),
to participate in the Program. The Commission shall adopt stringent standards for selection of
the other institutions for the most effective educator preparation programs, including the
following:
(1) Demonstrates high rates of educator effectiveness on value-added models and
teacher evaluations, including using performance-based, subject-specific
assessment and support systems, such as edTPA or other metrics of evaluating
candidate effectiveness that have predictive validity.
(2) Demonstrates measurable impact of prior graduates on student learning,
including impact of graduates teaching in qualifying licensure areas.
(3) Demonstrates high rates of graduates passing exams required for teacher
licensure.
(4) Provides curricular and co-curricular enhancements in leadership, facilitates
learning for diverse learners, and promotes community engagement,
classroom management, and reflection and assessment.
(5) Requires at least a minor concentration of study in the subject area that the
candidate may teach.
(6) Provides early and frequent internship or practical experiences, including the
opportunity for participants to perform practicums in diverse school
environments.
(7) Is approved by the State Board of Education as an educator preparation
program.
(8) For an educator preparation program enrolling loan recipients in a program of
study leading to licensure in elementary education (K-6), provides training
Page 2 Senate Bill 865-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
that is aligned with the Science of Reading in accordance with
G.S. 115C-269.20. The Commission shall contract with a third-party entity to
biennially evaluate whether a program identified in this subdivision is
providing training that is aligned with the Science of Reading.
(g) Awards of Forgivable Loans. – The Program shall provide forgivable loans to selected
students to be used at up to 10 selected the participating institutions for completion of a program
leading to initial teacher licensure as follows:
(1) North Carolina high school seniors. – Forgivable loans of up to five thousand
dollars ($5,000) per semester for up to eight semesters.
(2) Students applying for transfer to a selected educator preparation program at
an institution of higher education. – Forgivable loans of up to five thousand
dollars ($5,000) per semester for up to six semesters.
(3) Individuals currently holding a bachelor's degree seeking preparation for
teacher licensure. – Forgivable loans of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000)
per semester for up to four semesters.
(4) Students matriculating at institutions of higher education who are changing to
an approved program of study at a selected educator preparation program. –
Forgivable loans of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) per semester for up
to four semesters.
Forgivable loans may be used for tuition, fees, the cost of books, and expenses related to
obtaining licensure.
…."
SECTION 4.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026, and applies beginning
with the 2026-2027 academic year.

PART V. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Senate Bill 865-First Edition Page 3